Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-706
Affordable Housing Trust Fund; eligible
activities.

The following activities are eligible for assistance
from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund:

(1) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing to assist
low-income and very low-income families;

(2) Matching funds for new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition
of housing units to assist low-income and very low-income families;

(3) Technical assistance, design and finance services, and consultation
for eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations involved
in the creation of affordable housing;

(4) Matching funds for operating costs for housing assistance groups
or organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the recipient's
ability to produce affordable housing;

(5) Mortgage insurance guarantees for eligible projects;

(6) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation of
housing to assist low-income or very low-income families;

(7) Projects making affordable housing more accessible to families with
elderly members or members who have disabilities;

(8) Projects providing housing in areas determined by the Department
of Economic Development to be of critical importance for the continued economic
development and economic well-being of the community and where, as determined
by the department, a shortage of affordable housing exists;

(9) Infrastructure projects necessary for the development of affordable
housing;

(10) Downpayment and closing cost assistance;

(11) Demolition of existing vacant, condemned, or obsolete housing or
industrial buildings or infrastructure;

(12) Housing education programs developed in conjunction with affordable
housing projects. The education programs must be directed toward:

(a) Preparing potential home buyers to purchase affordable housing and
postpurchase education;

(b) Target audiences eligible to utilize the services of housing assistance
groups or organizations; and

(c) Developers interested in the rehabilitation, acquisition, or construction
of affordable housing;

(13) Support for efforts to improve programs benefiting homeless youth; and

(14) Vocational training
in the housing and construction trades industries by nonprofit groups.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 16;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 101;

Laws 2005, LB 40, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB388, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB413, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 25.